Utah statutes.
10-2-417.   District court review -- Notice.
(1)  Review of a boundary commission decision may be sought in the district
court with jurisdiction in the county in which the boundary commission is
established by filing a petition for review of the decision within 20 days of
the commission's decision under Section 10-2-416.
(2)  The district court review shall be on the record of the hearing under
Section 10-2-415 and may not be de novo review.
(3)  The district court shall affirm the commission's decision unless the
court determines that the decision is arbitrary or capricious.
